Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
General Provisions

§79-15-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as “The Mississippi Investment Trust Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 1, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Small business investment companies, see §§ 79-7-1 et seq.

Foreign investment trusts, see §§ 79-15-101 et seq.

§79-15-3.
Definitions.

An “investment trust” is an express trust created by a written declaration of trust whereby three (3) or more trustees agree to hold and manage in trust property conveyed or to be conveyed to them as trustees for the benefit of such persons as may be or become holders of transferable certificates evidencing the beneficial interest in the trust estate. An investment trust organized in conformity with and by specific reference to this chapter is declared to be neither a general nor a limited partnership, even though the declaration of trust may contain provisions not expressly or by implication contained in this chapter, and even though one (1) or more of the trustees may be or become the holder of a certificate of beneficial interest in the investment trust of which he is trustee.

A “foreign investment trust” is an investment trust for profit organized under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose or purposes for which an investment trust may be organized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Provision for income tax deduction with respect to dividends distributed during the taxable year by an investment trust defined in this section, see § 27-7-17.

Limited partnerships, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 1 et seq.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts § 1, 3.

§79-15-5.
Organization.

An investment trust may be established by a declaration of trust, duly executed by three or more trustees, for any lawful purpose including, but not limited to, acquiring, managing, improving, leasing, dealing in, selling, or otherwise alienating, mortgaging, or otherwise encumbering, real and personal property of all kinds, and descriptions, including, dealing in, purchasing, holding, selling and exchanging stocks, bonds, mortgages, deeds of trust and other securities of all kinds and descriptions; receiving the income, dividends, rents, profits and returns therefrom, and investing same or distributing same to the beneficial owners of the trust in accordance with the terms of the declaration of trust.

At all times during the existence of the investment trust, at least one of the trustees shall be a natural person and a resident of the State of Mississippi. The other trustees need not be natural persons or residents of this state unless the declaration of trust or bylaws so require. The declaration of trust or bylaws may provide other or additional qualifications for the trustees consistent with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 3, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 11 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:15, 51:23 et seq.

15B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Real Estate Investment Trusts and Syndications §§ 218:12 et seq. (declaration of trust).

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 9-14.

§79-15-7.
What declaration shall contain.

The declaration of trust of an investment trust shall contain:

The name under which the trust shall conduct its business, which name shall include the words “investment trust” but shall not include the words “trust company.”

An express statement that the trust is formed pursuant to this chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and that all provisions of the declaration of trust are subject to and intended to be construed in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, as now or hereafter amended.

The post-office address of the principal office and place of business of the trust.

The full name and post-office address of the initial trustees of the trust.

The aggregate number of shares of beneficial interest which the trust shall have authority to issue, the unit value in dollars to be received by the trust for the issuance of each of such shares, and a statement that each share shall be equal in all respects to every other share.

The manner of calling and conducting meetings of the holders of certificates of beneficial interest, and the mode or voting by proxy, provided that a meeting of the holders of certificates of beneficial interest shall be held at least annually.

A requirement that the trustees shall keep accurate and complete books of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of the trustees and shall keep a record of the holders of certificates of beneficial interest, giving the names and addresses of all such holders and the number of shares held by each, which books and records shall be available for inspection by any holders of a certificate of beneficial interest, at the principal place of business during normal business hours, upon reasonable notice. Provided, that nothing in this chapter shall impair the power of any court of competent jurisdiction upon a proper showing to compel the production, for examination of the books and the records of account, minutes, and record of holders of certificates of beneficial interest, by any person who for cause shown is entitled to conduct such examination.

The declaration of trust may contain any other terms and provisions deemed necessary or desirable for the purposes of the investment trust and consistent with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 4, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 12, 13.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:15, 51:23 et seq.

15B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Real Estate Investment Trusts and Syndications §§ 218:12 et seq. (declaration of trust).

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts § 14.

§79-15-9.
Powers and liabilities of trustees.

The trustees shall hold the legal title to all property at any time belonging to the investment trust, and shall have complete control over the management, operation, disposition, investment and reinvestment of such property and complete control of the management of the business affairs of the investment trust. The trustees may, if so provided in the declaration of trust, elect one of their number as chairman and elect such other officers as may be provided in the declaration of trust. The trustees may designate one or more of their number to act for and on behalf of the trustees in the execution of deeds, notes and other written instruments.

The trustees shall have such powers as to the investment and management of the trust estate as may be set out in the declaration of trust, without regard to the type of investments to which trustees generally are restricted by the provisions of Section 91-13-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or by any other statute or rule of law or equity. Unless the declaration of trust shall so provide, it shall not be necessary for an investment trust or the trustees thereof to file an accounting with any court, except upon liquidation of the trust. Provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall impair the power of any court of competent jurisdiction, upon a proper showing of cause, to compel an accounting by the trustees of an investment trust of all funds held by them in such capacity.

Liability to third persons for any act, omission, or obligation of an investment trust or of a trustee of an investment trust, when acting in such capacity, shall extend to the whole of the trust estate or to so much thereof as may be necessary to discharge such liability, but no trustee shall be personally or individually liable to third persons for any such act, omission, or obligation, unless such trustee with respect to such act, omission, or obligation engaged in intentional fraud or other unlawful conduct prohibited by statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 5, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 41 et seq.

5 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Business Trusts, Forms 1, 4.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:51 et seq., 51:91-51:93, 51:103 et seq., 51:123 et seq., 51:143 et seq.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 27 et seq.

§79-15-11.
Certificates of beneficial interest.

The beneficial ownership of an investment trust shall be evidenced by certificates issued by the trustees in units of value to be provided by the trust instrument. No investment trust shall issue certificates of beneficial interest except for money, labor done, or services rendered or property actually received for the use and lawful purposes of the investment trust. Any investment trust may purchase any property authorized by its declaration of trust, or necessary for the use and lawful purposes of such investment trust, and may issue certificates of beneficial interest to the amount of the value thereof in payment therefor. Any certificate of beneficial interest issued in compliance with this section shall be fully paid, and the holder thereof shall not be liable to any further call or for any further payment. No assessment shall be made against the interest of any holder of such fully paid certificates. In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the judgment of the trustees as to the value of labor done or services performed or property purchased shall be conclusive. For the purpose of determining whether certificates of beneficial interest of any investment trust are fully paid and not liable to any further call, no deduction shall be made in computing the amount of consideration received by such investment trust for such certificates of beneficial interest, for such reasonable compensation or discount in the sale, underwriting, or purchase of such certificates by underwriters or dealers or others performing similar services as may be paid or allowed by the investment trust; and for such purpose the judgment of the trustees as the value of such services shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud in the transaction.

The certificates of beneficial interest issued pursuant to this section shall be transferable in the same manner as stock certificates of a business corporation are transferable, and the issuance and transfer of such certificates of beneficial interest shall be governed by the statutes applicable to the issuance and transfer of stock of business corporations to the extent that such statutes are not inconsistent with the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 6, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Regulation of transfer of investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code, see
§ 75-8-101 et seq.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 20 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:164 et seq., 51:174, 51:175.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 16-20.

§79-15-13.
Liability of holders of certificates of beneficial interest.

No holder of a fully paid certificate of beneficial interest in an investment trust shall be personally or individually liable in any manner whatever for any debts, acts, omissions, or obligations incurred by the trustees or by the investment trust. It is expressly declared to be the intention of this chapter that the holders of fully paid certificates of beneficial interest issued by an investment trust organized pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered to be partners, either general or limited, in the business of the trust, and the limited liability provided by this section shall not be altered by reason of the fact that the declaration of trust may contain a provision for the election of successor trustees by the holders of certificates of beneficial interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 7, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Limited partnerships, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 31 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:183 et seq., 51:194, 51:195.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 22 et seq.

§79-15-15.
The election and removal of trustees.

The declaration of trust shall provide for the annual election of successor trustees by the holders of certificates of beneficial interest, and shall further provide for the election of successor trustees by the holder of beneficial interest in the event of the death, resignation or removal of a trustee. The election of successor trustees shall not be deemed an amendment to the declaration of trust within the meaning of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 8, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts §§ 41-46.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:51, 51:78, 51:191.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 27, 29.

§79-15-17.
Amendment of declaration of trust.

The declaration of trust shall provide that it can be amended only by the affirmative vote of the holders of at least two thirds (2/3) of the amount of the then outstanding certificates of beneficial interest. If the declaration of trust shall provide that an amendment to the declaration of trust shall require an affirmative vote of holders of a greater percentage in the amount of then outstanding certificates of beneficial interest than provided by this section, then the declaration of trust shall control. The foregoing provisions shall not be applicable to an amendment made to a declaration of trust at any time prior to the issuance of certificates of beneficial interest; at any time prior to the issuance of certificates and beneficial interest, the declaration of trust may be amended by affirmative vote of a majority of the trustees.

No amendment to the declaration of trust shall be effective to alter or expand the liability of the trustees or the liability of the holders of fully paid certificates of beneficial interest, contrary to the liability provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 9, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Power of court to authorize modification of trust instrument because of changes in tax law. 57 A.L.R.3d 1044.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts § 15.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:73, 51:74.

§79-15-19.
Recording.

The declaration of trust shall be signed and acknowledged by the initial trustees and recorded in the office of the clerk of the chancery court in the county in which the principal place of business of the investment trust is located, and also with the Secretary of State of Mississippi, and such officers are authorized to charge a fee for such recording, as in the manner and in the amount provided for the recording of articles of incorporation of business corporations. Amendments to declarations of trust shall be recorded in the manner above set out for the original.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 10, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Secretary of State, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Duty of chancery court clerk to keep records, see § 9-5-137.

Recording of instruments by chancery court clerk, see § 89-5-25.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts § 14.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 30, 42.

§79-15-21.
Duration of investment trust; rule against perpetuities and restraint of alienation are not violated.

An investment trust shall not be deemed invalid as violating the rule against perpetuities or any law or statute against suspension of the powers of alienation. Such trust may continue for an indefinite period or for such time as may be necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes for which it was created; provided, however, that the declaration of trust shall contain a provision that such trust may be terminated at any time by the affirmative vote of holders of at least two thirds (2/3) of the amount of certificates of beneficial interest then outstanding, in the manner hereafter provided.

At any meeting called for the purpose, notice of the purpose being contained in the call, the holders of at least two thirds (2/3) of the amount of certificates of beneficial interest then outstanding may by their affirmative vote dissolve the investment trust; the trustees shall thereupon file with the secretary of state an attested certified copy of the minutes of the meeting at which such vote was taken, together with a statement of the names and addresses of all trustees duly verified. The secretary of state, upon receipt of the above, shall record same and execute a certificate to the effect that such minutes and statement have been filed and that it appears therefrom that the investment trust has complied with this section. Such certificate shall be filed for record by the investment trust in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county wherein the original declaration of trust was recorded, and thereupon such investment trust shall be dissolved and shall cease to carry on business except for the purpose of adjusting and winding up its affairs. It shall then proceed to adjust and wind up its business, be empowered to carry out its contracts, collect its accounts receivable, and liquidate its assets and apply the same in discharge of its obligations and, after paying such obligations, the holder of each certificate of beneficial interest, according to the amount paid in thereon, shall be entitled to his portion of the balance of the assets. Said investment trust shall continue in existence for the purpose of discharging its debts and obligations, collect and distribute its assets, and doing all other acts required in order to wind up its business, and may sue and be sued for the purpose of enforcing such debts and obligations until its affairs are fully adjusted and wound up for three (3) years.

If the holders of certificates of beneficial interest of an investment trust shall vote to dissolve, any holder of a certificate of beneficial interest of such trust may, within six (6) months from the date that the certificate of dissolution is filed with the chancery clerk as herein provided, demand an accounting by the trustees of all assets held by them in such capacity; and the chancery court of the county wherein the original declaration of trust was recorded shall have jurisdiction to compel such accounting upon petition by any holder of a certificate of beneficial interest in the investment trust.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 11, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Secretary of state, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts § 19.

5 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Business Trusts, Form 1.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts §§ 51:204-51:208.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts § 15.

§79-15-23.
How investment trust sued.

An investment trust may sue or be sued as a separate and distinct entity, under the name set forth in the declaration of trust, and it shall not be necessary to join the trustees individually or the holders of certificates of beneficial interest as parties plaintiff or defendant. An investment trust may be sued, at law or in equity, for debts and other obligations incurred by the trustees in the performance of their duties under the declaration of trust, and for damages to third persons resulting from the negligence of such trustees in the performance of their duties under the declaration of trust, and its property shall be subject to attachment and execution, all in like manner as if it were a corporation.

The trustees shall severally be agents for service of process upon an investment trust. An investment trust organized pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be domiciled in the State of Mississippi and in the county of its principal office and place of business within that state, without regard to the residence of the trustees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 12, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Attachments generally, see §§ 11-33-1 et seq.

Service of process on trustees, see § 13-3-41.

Levy of execution generally, see §§ 13-3-111 et seq.

5 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Business Trusts, Forms 2, 4, 5.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 50, 52-61, 64.

§79-15-25.
How investment trust taxed.

The income of an investment trust shall be taxed as if the investment trust were a business corporation with the exception of the dividend deduction allowed an investment trust under Section 27-7-17. An investment trust shall be deemed a domestic corporation for purposes of the corporation franchise tax imposed by Sections 27-13-1 through 27-13-61, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 13; Laws, 1985, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Income tax, see §§ 27-7-1 et seq.

Corporation franchise tax, see §§ 27-13-1 et seq.

§79-15-27.
Effect of chapter on prior rights, duties, penalties and proceedings.

This chapter shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before May 15, 1962.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 14, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

§79-15-29.
Applicability of other laws; repeals.

The provisions of the Investment Securities chapter and other appropriate provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and the provisions of the Mississippi Blue Sky Laws, Sections 75-71-1 through 75-71-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the regulations and rules adopted thereunder, and the provisions of the Fiduciary Transfer Law, Sections 91-11-1 through 91-11-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be applicable to investment trusts organized pursuant to this chapter. All other laws applicable to business corporations organized for profit shall be applicable to investment trusts organized pursuant to this chapter, to the extent that such laws are not inconsistent with the provisions and purposes of this chapter. All laws or parts of laws in conflict with the provisions of this chapter are hereby repealed to the extent of such conflict only.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5570-15; Laws, 1962, ch. 238, § 15, eff immediately upon its passage and approval by the Governor (approved May 15, 1962).

Sections 75-71-1 through 75-71-57 referred to in this section were repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 521, § 418, eff from and after July 1, 1981.
For current provisions, see §§ 75-71-101 et seq.

Investment securities under Uniform Commercial Code, see §§ 75-8-101 et seq.

What gives rise to right of rescission under state blue sky laws.
52 A.L.R.5th 491.